languages/apertium-kaa/tests/G.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../kaa.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../kaa.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] {G}{ъ} becomes g'":
    jıl<n><dat> : jılg'a
    maqala<n><dat> : maqalag'a
    adam<n><dat> : adamg'a
    qıl<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : qılg'an
    bol<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : bolg'an

 "[twol] {G}{ъ} becomes g":
    til<n><dat> : tilge
    kel<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : kelgen

 "[twol] {G}{ъ} becomes k":
    ma'mleket<n><dat> : ma'mleketke
    ket<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : ketken
    ish<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : ishken

 "[twol] {G}{ъ} becomes q":
    kitap<n><dat> : kitapqa
    soq<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : soqqan

 "[twol] q stays q":
    tarmaq<n><dat> : tarmaqqa

 "[twol] q becomes g'":
    tarmaq<n><px3sp><nom> : tarmag'ı

 "[twol] k stays k":
    bilezik<n><dat> : bilezikke

 "[twol] k becomes g":
    bilezik<n><px3sp><nom> : bilezigi
